District of Columbia statutes.
29-801.03

Knowledge; notice.

(a)

A person knows a fact when the person:

(1)

Has actual knowledge of it; or

(2)

Is deemed to know it under subsection (d)(1) of this section or law other than this chapter.

(b)

A person has notice of a fact when the person:

(1)

Has reason to know the fact from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

(2)

Is deemed to have notice of the fact under subsection (d)(2) of this section;

(c)

A person notifies another of a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person knows the fact.

(d)

A person that is not a member shall be deemed to:

(1)

Know of a limitation on authority to transfer real property as provided in § 29-803.02(g); and

(2)

Have notice of a limited liability company’s:

(A)

Dissolution, 90 days after a statement of dissolution under § 29- 807.02(b)(2)(A) becomes effective;

(B)

Termination, 90 days after a statement of termination § 29-807.02(b)(2)(F) becomes effective; and

(C)

Participation in a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication, 90 days after the articles of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under subchapter IX of this chapter or under Chapter 2 of this title becomes effective.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(2)(B), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-803.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote (d)(2)(C).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 103 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.